Maine, session 132, LD1261.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3877 is enacted to read:
§3877. Community Navigator Pilot Program
The Community Navigator Pilot Program, referred to in this section as "the pilot
program," is established within the department as a 2-year pilot program to award contracts
through the department to 4 child abuse and neglect prevention councils selected by the
department for 4 community navigators.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context indicates otherwise, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Community services" means services that provide assistance to individuals or
families, including but not limited to the following services: physical and mental health
care; housing assistance; food access assistance; fuel assistance; child care;
transportation; employment training; and substance use disorder treatment.
B. "Mandated reporter" means an adult person required pursuant to section 4011-A,
subsection 1 to report or cause a report to be made to the department when the person
knows or has reasonable cause to suspect that a child has been or is likely to be abused
or neglected or that a suspicious child death has occurred.
C. "Screened out," with respect to a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, means
the department has determined that the report does not meet the department's criteria
to open a child protective services investigation.
2. Community navigator; service population. A community navigator under the pilot
program shall work with the following populations:
A. Families that have been reported to the department for suspected child abuse or
neglect, and the report was screened out, but the families would likely benefit from
available community services for support and to prevent the need for intervention by
child protective services in the future;
B. Mandated reporters that reported to the department a family described in paragraph
A; and
C. Mandated reporters generally, including, but not limited to, teachers, social workers
and medical professionals.
3. Services provided by community navigator. This subsection governs the services
provided by a community navigator under the pilot program.
A. A community navigator shall work with a family described in subsection 2,
paragraph A to connect that family with appropriate community services. When
appropriate, the community navigator may involve in this process the mandated
reporter that reported the suspected child abuse or neglect, including, but not limited
to, the child's teacher or social worker.
B. A community navigator shall engage in outreach activities to provide education and
guidance to mandated reporters designed to:
(1) Improve mandated reporters' knowledge of available community services and
other resources;
Page 1 - 132LR1717(01)

(2) Instruct mandated reporters how to refer a family to community services in the
area where the family resides; and
(3) Provide mandated reporters with guidelines for working directly with families
in need to help shift the role of mandated reporters from just reporting suspected
child abuse or neglect to actively supporting families in need.
4. Contracts awarded; funding. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the
contrary, the department shall award a contract to 4 child abuse and neglect prevention
councils for a community navigator under the pilot program in accordance with this
subsection. The department shall determine to which child abuse and neglect prevention
councils the contracts are awarded based on which child abuse and neglect prevention
councils are most prepared to participate in the pilot program. The department shall provide
funding for each community navigator in the amount of $90,000 per community navigator,
per year, for both year one and year 2 of the pilot program. The department shall award
the contracts pursuant to this subsection no later than December 1, 2025.
5. Repeal. This section is repealed January 30, 2028.